Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-908.01
Dental services; reimbursement rates.

It is the intent of the Legislature to increase reimbursement rates by twelve and one-half percent for fiscal year 2024-25 for dental services provided under the Medical Assistance Act.

Laws 2024, LB358, § 2.